src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-manecj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - манэць: # Verb 'to see, to look' /Type 18/ - partial paradigm  

     манэць+V+TV+ConNeg: манэсˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Evas+Abs: манэˮмоӈгад
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+ConNeg: манэтˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: манэтаӈахаюниʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: манэтыниʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: манэтамиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: манэтаниʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: манэтаӈахаюдиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: манэтыдиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: манэтариʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: манэтадиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: манэтаӈахаюдиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: манэтыдиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: манэтадиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: манэтаӈахаʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: манэтаӈахаюнаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: манэтынаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: манэтаваˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: манэтаваˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: манэтаӈахаюдаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: манэтыдаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: манэтараˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: манэтадаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: манэтаӈахаюдоʼ 
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: манэтыдоʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: манэтадоʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: манэтаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: манэтаӈахаюн
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: манэтын
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: манэтав
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: манэтадмʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: манэтаӈахаюд
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: манэтыд
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: манэтар
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: манэтан
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: манэтаӈахаюда
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: манэтыда
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: манэтада
     манэць+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: манэта
     манэць+V+TV+GerFin: манэˮманзь      
     манэць+V+TV+Ger: манэць 
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюниʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: манэˮяниʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: манэˮӈамиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: манэˮӈаниʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюдиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: манэˮядиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: манэˮӈариʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: манэˮӈадиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюдиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: манэˮядиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: манэˮӈадиʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: манэˮӈахаʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюнаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: манэˮянаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: манэˮӈаваˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: манэˮӈаваˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюдаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: манэˮядаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: манэˮӈараˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: манэˮӈадаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюдоʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: манэˮядоʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: манэˮӈадоʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: манэˮӈаˮ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюн
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: манэˮян
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: манэˮӈав
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: манэˮӈадмʼ
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюд
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: манэˮяд
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: манэˮӈар
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: манэˮӈан
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюда
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: манэˮяда
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: манэˮӈада
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: манэˮӈа
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюнинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: манэˮянинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: манэˮӈаминзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: манэˮӈанинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюдинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: манэˮядинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: манэˮӈаринзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: манэˮӈадинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюдинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: манэˮядинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: манэˮӈадинзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: манэˮӈаханзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюнаць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: манэˮянаць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: манэˮӈаваць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: манэˮӈаваць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюдаць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: манэˮядаць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: манэˮӈараць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: манэˮӈадаць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюдонзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: манэˮядонзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: манэˮӈадонзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: манэˮӈаць
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюнась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: манэˮянась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: манэˮӈавась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: манэˮӈадамзь
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюдась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: манэˮядась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: манэˮӈарась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: манэˮӈанась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: манэˮӈахаюдась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: манэˮядась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: манэˮӈадась
     манэць+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: манэˮӈась
     манэць+V+TV+InfImprf: манэˮма  
     манэць+V+TV+InfPrf: манэсоˮма  
     манэць+V+TV+PrcFut: манэˮманда   
     манэць+V+TV+PrcImprf: манэта
     манэць+V+TV+PrcNeg: манэˮмадавэй
     манэць+V+TV+PrcPrf: манэˮмы
     манэць+V+TV+Subord+Abs: манэпˮ
